Maine, session 132, LD998.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §600, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 537, §1, is further
amended to read:
1. Firearms in vehicles. An employer or an agent of an employer may not prohibit
an employee who has a valid permit to carry a concealed firearm under Title 25, chapter
252 from keeping a firearm in the employee's vehicle as long as the vehicle is locked and
the firearm is not visible. This subsection applies to the State as an employer when a state
employee's vehicle is on property owned or leased by the State. This subsection does not
authorize an employee or state employee to carry a firearm in a place where carrying a
firearm is prohibited by law. For purposes of this section, "state employee" means an
employee of the State within the executive branch, the legislative branch or the judicial
branch performing services within the scope of that employee's employment.